District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.08

Repeal of certain prior laws; saving clause.

(a)

The provisions of the act entitled “An Act regulating the speed of automobiles in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes,” approved June 29, 1906 (34 Stat. 621, ch. 3615), and, in so far as they relate to the regulation of vehicles or vehicle traffic in the District, the provisions of the act entitled “An act to authorize the Commissioners of the District of Columbia to make police regulations for the government of said District,” approved January 26, 1887 (24 Stat. 369, ch. 49) and of the joint resolution entitled “Joint resolution to regulate licenses to proprietors of theaters in the city of Washington, District of Columbia, and for other purposes,” approved February 26, 1892 (27 Stat. 394, Res. 4, 7) and of the act entitled “An act making appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending June 30th, 1918, and for other purposes,” approved March 3, 1917 (39 Stat. 1064, ch. 160), are repealed. The provisions of § 20 of the Act entitled “An Act to prevent the manufacture and sale of alcoholic liquors in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes,” approved March 3, 1917 (39 Stat. 1129, ch. 165), shall not apply to any person operating any motor vehicle in the District.

(b)

Any violation of any provision of law or regulation issued thereunder which is repealed by this part and any liability arising under such provisions or regulations may, if the violation occurred or the liability arose prior to such repeal, be prosecuted to the same extent as if this part had not been enacted.

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1125, ch. 443, § 16(a), (c)
1981 Ed., § 40-722.
1973 Ed., § 40-614.